<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR891018-0010 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.10-18-89.f2.A1009</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 200 / Wednesday, October 18, 1989/ Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Federal Railroad Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[FRA Docket No. RSEP-6, Notice No. 2] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">49 CFR Part 209  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 2130-AA49 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Railroad Safety Enforcement Procedures; Disqualification Proceedings</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY:</T2> Federal Railroad Administration (FRA), DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION:</T2> Final rule.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY:</T2> FRA is amending its railroad safety enforcement regulations(49 CFR part 209) to prescribe procedures for disqualifying railroad employees,including managers, supervisors, and other agents from performing safety-sensitivefunctions in the rail industry. Section 3(a) of the Rail Safety ImprovementAct of 1988 authorizes FRA to disqualify individuals who are shown to beunfit to perform safety- sensitive functions, based on the individual'sviolation of an FRA safety rule, regulation, order or standard. These proceduresare intended to assure the prompt and efficient conduct of disqualificationproceedings under the Act while affording administrative due process tothose against whom such proceedings are initiated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE:</T2> This final rule will be effective November 17,1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> Daniel C. Smith, Deputy AssistantChief Counsel for Safety, Office of Chief Counsel, FRA, 400 Seventh Street,SW., Washington, DC, 20590. Telephone: (202) 366-0628.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Introduction </ITAG>On December 9, 1988, FRA published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> a notice of proposed rulemaking (NPRM) to amendpart 209, entitled ``Railroad Safety Enforcement Procedures,'' by revisingSubpart A_General and adding a new Subpart D_Disqualification Proceduresprescribing procedures for disqualifying railroad employees, includingmanagers, supervisors, and other agents from performing safety-sensitivefunctions in the rail industry (53 FR 49695). A public hearing was heldin Washington, DC on January 5, 1989, at which seven organizations wererepresented: Three railroads, one organization representing railroads,and three organizations representing railroad employees. In addition, thoseorganizations provided prepared statements, and written comments were receivedfrom one individual, one labor union, and six other railroads. The Rail Safety Improvement Act of 1988 (RSIA), Public Law 100-342, 102Stat. 624 (June 22, 1988), empowers the Secretary to disqualify individualswho are shown to be unfit to perform safety-sensitive functions, basedon violations of safety rules, regulations, orders or standards ``afternotice and opportunity for a hearing.'' A preliminary question was whether the RSIA requires formal, trial-type``on the record'' hearings (<T3>i.e., </T3>characterized by testimony of witnesses under oath, cross-examination,and compulsory process) under 5 U.S.C. 554, 556, and 557. There is no declarationin the RSIA of an individual's right to an ``on the record'' hearing. Neitheris there any reference to such a procedural requirement in the ConferenceReport. See H.R. Rep. No. 100-637, 100th Cong., 2d Sess. 20 (1988). NoHouse Report was issued. The debates in the House and the Senate shed nolight on the issue. <T3>See </T3>133 Cong. Rec. S15893-15910 (daily ed. November 15, 1987)(Senate floor debate and passage of S. 1539); 133 Cong. Rec. H11745-11753(daily ed. December 18, 1987) (House floor debate and passage of H.R. 3743);134 Cong. Rec. H218-224 (daily ed. February 3, 1988) (House passage ofS. 1539 as amended to conform to H.R. 3743); 134 Cong. Rec. H3468-3472(daily ed. May 23, 1988) (House floor debate and passage of conferencecommittee substitute for S. 1539); 134 Cong. Rec. S7506-7512 (daily ed.June 9, 1988) (Senate floor debate and passage of conference committeesubstitute for S. 1539). The Senate Report, however, opines that underthe disqualification procedure the ``employee would be entitled to a complete,on-the-record hearing.'' S. Rep. No. 100-153, 100th Cong., 2d Sess. 9-10(1988). While the nature and scope of the hearing required in disqualificationproceedings is not defined in the RSIA, it is clear that the RSIA contemplatesthat fact finding and discretion shall be vested in the agency. FRA believes,therefore, that it is essential to promulgate procedures that assure theprompt and efficient conduct of disqualification proceedings under thestatute, afford administrative due process to those against whom such proceedingsare initiated, and lead to the creation of a record in each individualproceeding that will form the basis for judicial review in the United StatesDistrict Court without a trial <T3>de novo </T3>of the relevant facts. For those reasons, the proceduresfor formal hearings set forth under 5 U.S.C. 554, 556 and 557 have beenadopted in this rule. <ITAG tagnum="84">Legislative Background </ITAG>Section 3(a)(4) of the RSIA, which amends section 209 of the Federal RailroadSafety Act of 1970 (FRSA) (to be codified at 45 U.S.C. 438(f)), authorizesFRA, as delegated by the Secretary, to issue orders disqualifying railroademployees, including supervisors, managers, and other agents from performingsafety-sensitive functions in the rail industry. Before such an individualmay be disqualified, he or she must receive notice alleging (1) that heor she violated a ``rule, regulation, order, or standard'' issued by FRAunder the Federal railroad safety statutes codified at Title 45, UnitedStates Code (<T3>i.e., </T3>FRSA, 45 U.S.C. 421 <T3>et seq.</T3>; Safety Appliance Acts, 45 U.S.C. 1-16; Locomotive InspectionAct, 45 U.S.C. 22-34; Accident Reports Act, 45 U.S.C. 38-43; and the Hoursof Service Act, 45 U.S.C. 61-64.), and (2) that based in whole or in parton the violation, the individual is unfit to perform safety-sensitive functions.In addition, the individual must have received an opportunity for a hearing.There is, however, one narrow exception to the notice and hearing proviso:The RSIA specifically reserves the FRA's authority under section 203 ofthe FRSA (45 U.S.C. 432) to issue an emergency order immediately disqualifyingan individual when he or she is engaging in unsafe practices that ``createan emergency situation involving a hazard of death or injury to persons.''Prior to the RSIA, FRA had no enforcement authority over an individualwho violated its safety regulations. FRA's sole remedy was against theemploying railroad. With enactment of the RSIA, FRA is empowered to: First,impose civil penalties against individuals for willful violations of therail safety regulations and the Safety Appliance Acts, Locomotive InspectionAct, Accident Reports Act, Hours of Service Act, and Signal InspectionAct (RSIA sections 3(a)(3), 13(1)(F) and (2)(C), 14(7)(A), 15(4), 16(6)(A),and 17(7)(A); see also 53 FR 52918, December 29, 1988, final rule and statementsof policy entitled ``Amendments to Railroad Safety Regulations to IncreaseStandard Civil Penalty Assessment Amounts''), and second, disqualify individualsfrom performing safety-sensitive functions in the rail industry for violationsof rail safety rules, regulations, standards or orders that evidence unfitnessto perform safety-sensitive functions. RSIA section 3(a)(4). FRA believes it is important to recognize the two categories of safetyviolations that the RSIA does not address because RSIA's disqualificationauthority extends only to violations of regulations and orders promulgatedunder Title 45 of the United States Code. First, it does not authorizethe agency to disqualify individuals for violations of the Hours of ServiceAct itself, but only for violations of the Hours of Service Act recordkeeping regulations set forth at 49 CFR part 228, subpart B. See 49 CFR228.21. Second, it does not permit FRA to disqualify individuals for violationsof the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, 49 U.S.C. 1801 <T3>et seq.</T3>, or for the regulations and standards promulgated thereunderaffecting carriage of hazardous materials by rail, 49 CFR parts 171-174and 179. Under the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, however, individualsmay be subject to civil penalties for knowingly violating the act or aregulation issued thereunder. See 49 U.S.C. 1809. Additionally, the RSIA does not authorize FRA to disqualify individualsfor violations of regulations that do not ``make (him or her) unfit forthe performance of safety-sensitive functions.'' Although FRA cannot envisionevery possible ramification of violations of each of its regulations, itis probable that violations of a few regulations would not meet the statutorystandard of unfitness. <ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion of Comments and Conclusions </ITAG>A total of 13 responses were received concerning the NPRM published inthe December 9, 1988 issue of the <T4>Federal Register.</T4> At the public hearing on January 5, 1989, sevenorganizations participated: Three railroads (Grand Trunk Western RailroadCompany, Illinois Central Railroad Company, and Chicago North Western TransportationCompany), one organization representing railroads (Association of AmericanRailroads), and three organizations representing railroad employees (RailwayLabor Executives' Association, United Transportation Union, and Brotherhoodof Locomotive Engineers). In addition, those organizations, with the exceptionof one railroad and one labor union, provided prepared statements or writtencomments and written comments were received from one individual (a truckdriver) and five other railroads (Burlington Northern Railroad, ConsolidatedRail Corporation, The Long Island Rail Road, Southeastern PennsylvaniaTransportation Authority, and Union Pacific Railroad Company). Discussionsfollow with respect to the primary issues raised by the commenters. 1. Should there be a limitations period after which the agency may notinitiate a disqualification period? The NPRM contained no time limit for issuing a notice of proposed disqualification.Four commenters recommended that the regulations provide a time limit withinwhich a disqualification proceeding may be initiated. One commenter requesteda period no longer than one year from the date of the action giving riseto issuance of the notice. Another commenter noted that many employmentlaw issues have six-month limitations periods (<T3>e.g.</T3>, employment discrimination actions under the Civil RightsAct, judicial enforcement of the Railway Labor Act, and suits for an allegedbreach of a union's duty of fair representation under the National LaborRelations Act) and recommended a six-month limitation period. Two commentersdid not recommend a specific limitations period, although they commentedthat there should be one. FRA is not persuaded that a limitations period specific to disqualificationproceedings is necessary or appropriate. The RSIA prescribes no limit onthe time within which either a disqualification proceeding may be initiatedor a suit for enforcement of a disqualification order may be brought. FRAis reluctant to limit by regulation the authority conferred upon it bythe RSIA to initiate disqualification proceedings against individuals whoare unfit to perform safety-sensitive functions in the rail industry. Ofcourse, the general statutes of limitations applicable to government claimsapply to enforcement actions by FRA. The one most likely to apply to disqualificationproceedings, and the one FRA will consider applicable, is the statute oflimitations for enforcement of civil penalties, which is five years fromthe date the violation was committed. 28 U.S.C. 2462. As a practical matter, FRA envisions that it will strive to issue a noticeof proposed disqualification against an individual within six months fromthe FRA's discovery of the individual's rule violation. Additionally, considerationis being given to requiring inspectors to provide railroad employees andtheir employers copies of inspection reports containing recommendationsto initiate disqualification proceedings, thereby putting them on noticethat a disqualification proceeding may be initiated. Not all recommendations,however, may result in the initiation of formal disqualification proceedings.Some may result in the issuance of warnings, as has sometimes occurredwhen a rule violation is serious, but not serious enough to warrant theinitiation of civil penalty proceedings against individuals under 49 CFRpart B for violations of regulations promulgated under the Hazardous MaterialsTransportation Act. Such a warning letter could be used as a factor infashioning an appropriate disqualification order for any subsequent ruleviolations by the individual. In addition, the act giving rise to the issuance of the warning could beone of a number of rule violations alleged in a subsequent notice of proposeddisqualification. In other words, while the first rule violation alonedid not warrant the actor's disqualification, it could, when coupled withother similar violations within, for example, a three year period, providean adequate basis for finding an individual unfit. A multi-year patternof rule violations and other unsafe behavior may make out a stronger casefor disqualification than a single rule violation. Since Congress couldhave, but did not, establish a specific statute of limitations for theinitiation of disqualification orders or their enforcement in the Federalcourts, FRA will not do so. FRA is, however, keenly aware of the legaland practical problems associated with lengthy delays between the occurrenceof an individual's rule violation and the initiation of a disqualificationproceeding. FRA fully intends to honor an individual's due process rightsin implementing the disqualification authority; disqualification proceedingswill be initiated in a timely manner. 2. Should full discovery be provided in the proceeding? The NPRM afforded limited prehearing information and evidence sharing.The Chief Counsel is required to provide respondent, with the notice ofproposed disqualification, the material that supports the charges. NPRMand final rule, andSection; 209.305(c). Requests for admission are permitted.NPRM, andSection; 209.317; final rule, andSection; 209.6. A prehearing conferenceis required at which, among other things, the parties may exchange witnesslists and hearing exhibits. NPRM, andSection; 209.323; final rule, andSection;209.319. Depositions could be introduced at the hearing when a witnesswas unavailable (NPRM, andSection; 209.321) and subpoenas requiring the attendanceof a witness or the production of documents or other tangible evidencemay be issued by the presiding officer (NPRM, andSection;andSection; 209.7and 209.319; final rule, andSection;andSection; 209.7 and 209.317).Three commenters proposed that, in the interests of fairness, the ChiefCounsel provide respondent with evidence acquired after issuance of thenotice. Four commenters proposed broad discovery, as provided by the FederalRules of Civil Procedure for judicial proceedings in United States DistrictCourts_<T3>e.g.</T3>, depositions, interrogatories, requests for production ofdocuments and things, and requests for admissions. One recommended a discoveryprocedure similar to that of the United States Merit Systems ProtectionBoard (MSPB) (which adjudicates appeals from federal employees who are,<T3>inter alia,</T3> removed or suspended from the federal service), whichpermits discovery by any method provided by the Federal Rules of CivilProcedure. FRA agrees to the first comment, and andSection; 209.305(c) now requiresthe Chief Counsel to provide respondent copies of any evidence acquiredafter issuance of the notice. See the text of the rule and the accompanyingdiscussion, <T3>infra.</T3> Under andSection; 209.319(a) the presiding officer is requiredto conduct the prehearing conference at least ten days before the hearingto allow the parties time to deal with any issues, exhibits, or witnessesidentified at the conference. See the text of the rule and the accompanyingdiscussion, <T3>infra.</T3> Discovery is not required by law in formal agency hearings. <T3>Pacific Gas and Electric</T3> v. <T3>Federal Energy Regulatory Comm'n,</T3> 746 F.2d 1278 (D.C. Cir. 1979).However, some discovery is arguably warranted if its refusal would denyrespondent due process. <T3>McClelland</T3> v. <T3>Andrus,</T3> 606 F.2d 1278 (D.C. Cir. 1979). The intent of these regulationsis to provide for a fair yet expeditious and relatively inexpensive procedureto adjudicate the charges set forth in the notice of proposed disqualification.FRA believes that the efficient use of requests for admission, the prehearingdisclosure of evidence underlying the notice of proposed disqualification,and the exchange of witness lists and exhibits at the prehearing conferencemore than satisfy an individual's due process rights. However, in the final rule FRA goes further by permitting the use of discoverydepositions when ordered by the presiding officer upon a showing of goodcause. See the text of section 209.8 and the accompanying discussion, <T3>infra.</T3> The final regulation still directs that disqualificationproceedings be conducted as expeditiously and as economically as possible.See andSection; 209.313(a). For example, a deposition will not be permittedif the request is unduly expensive in light of the needs of the case andresources of the parties. See andSection; 209.8(b)(2). Further, discoverymust generally be conducted within 90-120 days following receipt of anindividual's request for a hearing. See andSection; 209.313(c). In summary, with the intent of providing a fair, expeditious, and economicalproceeding, the final rule permits discovery within a specified time periodby deposition, request for production of documents and other tangible evidence,and request for admission; requires that respondents be provided copiesof any evidence acquired after issuance of the notice of proposed disqualification;and requires that prehearing conferences be conducted 10 days before thehearing. 3. After it is proven that the respondent committed a violation, is shiftingthe burden of proof to the respondent to prove his fitness contrary tolaw? Is a <T3>per se</T3> rule that a willful violation makes a person unfit contraryto law? The NPRM proposed that proof of a non-willful rule violation establishesa rebuttable presumption that the respondent is unfit to perform safety-sensitivefunctions. Once proof of a rule violation was adduced, the burden wouldshift to the respondent to prove his or her fitness. The NPRM also proposedthat proof of a willful violation establishes a conclusive presumptionthat the respondent is unfit. Five commenters, both labor organizations and railroads, argued stronglythat the rebuttable presumption of unfitness for a non-willful rule violationwas contrary to the FRA's burden of proof under RSIA. Two commenters, alabor organization and a railroad, commented that a <T3>per se</T3> rule that a willful violation proves a respondent's unfitnessis unfair and contrary to the RSIA. While FRA does not agree that the presumptions proposed were contrary tolaw, after careful consideration it has withdrawn this portion of the proposal.The presumptions do appear to impose unnecessarily heavy burdens on therespondent in disqualification proceedings. Section 209.329(a) of the final rule provides that a willful violationof certain regulations establishes a rebuttable presumption of unfitness.In this situation, the burden of proof would not shift to the respondent.As discussed in Fed. R. Evid. 301, the presumption would impose on respondentthe burden of going forward with evidence to rebut the presumption. Theburden of proof, which the agency meets upon proving a willful violation,remains at all times with the agency. See the text of the rule and theaccompanying discussion, <T3>infra.</T3> 4. Is the standard of proof, preponderance of the evidence, appropriatefor proving respondent's unfitness? The NPRM proposed that FRA be required to prove respondent's unfitnessand the appropriateness of the disqualification order by a preponderanceof the evidence. Two organizations commented that the proposed standard of proof was toolow. One recommended a clear and convincing evidence standard, a higherstandard commonly found in denaturalization proceedings and certain casesunder the due process and equal protection clauses of the Constitution.The other commenter stated that the standard should be even higher. Itproposed the same standard as that employed in criminal proceedings_beyonda reasonable doubt. Other commenters noted that there is no evidentiarystandard in railroad disciplinary hearings. One commenter stated that theevidentiary standard for review of a railroad disciplinary action by aPublic Law Board, which involves a record review only, was substantialevidence. FRA will adopt the preponderance of the evidence standard. That standardis the most common evidentiary standard employed in civil proceedings.For example, it is the standard used for removing and suspending federalemployees for misconduct. 5 U.S.C. 7512, 7513, and 7701(c)(1)(B). It ishigher than the standard employed for removing and demoting such employeesfor unacceptable performance. 5 U.S.C. 7701(c)(1)(A). No persuasive reasonswere given for establishing a higher standard of proof. The disqualificationof a person, while an extremely serious matter, is not analogous to criminalsanctions or deportation proceedings. Given the apparent lack of an evidentiarystandard in railroad disciplinary proceedings, the absence of any compellingneed for a higher standard, and the need to remove unfit employees fromthe work force, the standard proposed is both fair and satisfactory.5. Should the employer railroad be a party to a disqualification proceeding?The proposed rule identified the parties as the Chief Counsel and the individual.No provision is made for including the railroad that employed the respondentat the time of the alleged rule violation as a party or permitting it tointervene. Three organizations commented that the employer railroad should be a partyto the proceeding. They believe the results and record of a proceedingcould be used against them in labor arbitration, employee discrimination,or Federal Employers' Liability Act proceedings. As a consequence, theyargue that the employer railroad is a real party in interest to disqualificationproceedings. One commenter opined that the participation of the railroadas a party may be appropriate at some unspecified times, but that the railroadshould only be permitted to intervene by motion for good cause shown. Onecommenter vigorously opposed the participation of the railroad as a partyin a disqualification proceeding. FRA adopts the NPRM proposal that the parties to the proceeding are theChief Counsel and the individual. The participation of the railroad couldunduly complicate and lengthen the proceeding without providing a benefitto the public. There is nothing in the regulations to prevent the employerrailroad from representing the employee, whether contract or managerial,or to otherwise assist in the employee's defense. Further, railroad personnelmay be called (by either side) via subpoena to testify at the hearing.Since the employers are not parties to the proceeding, railroad counselshould be able to prevent a disqualification determination from being introducedor, at least, limit its evidentiary value in unrelated proceedings. Notein this regard andSection; 209.301(c), which clearly states that disqualificationdeterminations shall have no effect on subsequent railroad disciplinaryproceedings. Some commenters requested that the Chief Counsel provide a copy of a noticeof proposed disqualification to the railroad, so that the railroad wouldhave notice of disqualification proceedings initiated against its employees.FRA has decided to adopt this proposal. It will provide a copy of the noticeto the individual's employing railroad. See andSection; 209.305(d). 6. Should FRA retain discretion to initiate disqualification proceedingsfor violations of any rules, regulations, orders, or standards? Under the proposal, FRA would retain the discretion to initiate a disqualificationproceeding for a violation of any of its regulations. FRA's burden of proof,however, is to establish that such rule violation ``make(s) the individualunfit for the performance of safety-sensitive functions.'' RSIA, section3(a). Five commenters opined that there should be a threshold standard beforea disqualification action may be initiated for a rule violation. One statedthat the standard should be the same as the one employed for issuance ofan emergency order under the FRSA_<T3>i.e.</T3>, ``that an * * * unsafe practice * * * create(s) an emergencysituation involving a hazard of death or injury to persons.'' 45 U.S.C.432(a). Two organizations commented that disqualification actions wereonly appropriate for violations that cause a serious safety hazard. Thethird commenter remarked that such actions should be taken only for willfuland flagrant violations that evidence gross misconduct and that could resultin catastrophic incidents. The fifth commenter proposed that such actionsbe taken only when a rule violation causes an accident reportable under49 CFR part 225. The first commenter's proposal, endorsing the emergency order standard,is not appropriate. The RSIA expressly reserves FRA's authority to exerciseits power under 45 U.S.C. 432(a). To use the same standard in determiningan employee's unfitness in a disqualification proceeding would nullifythat statutory reservation of power. The second suggestion is not desirablebecause, while the prevention of serious safety hazards is certainly areason for disqualifying an individual, defining a general standard of``seriousness'' is not feasible. Whether a specific rule violation couldpose a ``serious'' safety hazard is best left to a case-by-case determination.The third recommendation is unacceptable because it would impose an inordinatelyhigh standard of misconduct coupled with the potential for an undefined``catastrophic'' accident before a person could be disqualified. The RSIAspecifically provides that individuals may be disqualified for non-willfulviolations of regulations. There is no compelling reason to limit arbitrarilyFRA's disqualification authority to the commission of willful violationsonly. Finally, the last comment would impose an undesirable and excessivelyhigh threshold_that a person's rule violation cause an accident. It isin the public interest to identify and prevent unfit persons from performingsafety-sensitive functions before they cause accidents, not after.FRA, therefore, does not adopt any of the foregoing suggestions and, asproposed in the NPRM, retains its discretion to initiate disqualificationproceedings for violations of any of its regulations. The statutory burdenof proof_that the employee is unfit to perform safety-sensitive functions_therequirement under andSection; 209.329(b) to consider the relevant factorsin determining an individual's unfitness, and personnel and financial resourcesnecessary to prosecute a disqualification, should impose sufficient checkson FRA to prevent an abuse of discretion. Public safety demands that FRAuse its discretion wisely and judiciously. Further, it is in the publicinterest to place railroad employees on notice that disqualification proceedingscould be initiated for any rule violation. Their potential liability shouldserve as an additional deterrent to the commission of such violations.7. Should an administrative appeal of a presiding officer's decision bepermitted by either party? The NPRM proposed that the decision of the presiding officer would be final.No appeal within the agency would be permitted by either the respondentor the Chief Counsel. FRA, however, specifically invited comments on whetherthe individual or the Chief Counsel, or both, should be allowed to appeala presiding officer's decision to the FRA Administrator_if the Administratorwas not involved in the issuance of the notice of proposed disqualification_orto some other Departmental official if the Administrator was involved inthe issuance of the notice. 53 FR 49695, 49699. No commenter expressly recommended that an administrative appeal of a presidingofficer's decision should not be permitted. One commenter suggested theindividual be permitted to appeal a presiding officer's decision. Two commentersrecommended that any of the parties, which they suggested should also includethe employer railroad, should be allowed to appeal. None of the commentersidentified a person to whom the appeal should be made. The principal benefits of the absence of an appeal are the presence ofa relatively inexpensive forum and the expeditious issuance of a finaldecision and order. The major detriments are the lack of administrativereview of the presiding officer's decision and the absence of the developmentof any agency precedent. The advantages of an administrative appeal includethe ability to develop agency precedent with respect to its determinationsof rule violations and other factors that evidence a railroad employee'sunfitness to perform safety-sensitive functions and the appropriate remedialsanctions that should be taken by the agency to protect the individual'scoworkers, other railroad employees, and the public. Given the fact thatthe rule does not provide a schedule of offenses and penalties for disqualificationactions, it is extremely important that the agency develop the foundationnecessary for building a cohesive, consistent body of agency precedenton those issues. In addition, a party will have the opportunity to seekredress of any perceived injustice imposed by the presiding officer's decision.The disadvantages of providing an administrative appeal include a moretime-consuming process for final adjudication of the charges against theindividual_the individual would not be disqualified while an appeal ispending (see andSection; 209.325(b)). Also, there is the concomitant riskthat an unfit individual would be permitted to continue work in safety-sensitiveactivities pending final disposition of the case. On balance, however, FRA believes that the advantages of an administrativeappeal outweigh its disadvantages. Disqualifying a railroad employee fromperforming safety-sensitive functions is a very serious and sensitive matter.It may result in the employee's loss of income and the loss of the employee'sservices to the railroad. He or she should be permitted the opportunityto seek administrative review of an initial decision recommending his orher disqualification. Further, in the interests of public safety, the ChiefCounsel should be permitted the opportunity to contest a dismissal orderor an inadequate disqualification order. For the foregoing reasons, FRA has decided to provide the opportunity forreview of a presiding officer's decision within the agency, and permiteither the Chief Counsel or the individual to appeal that decision to theAdministrator. See andSection;andSection; 209.323 through 209.327. Pursuantto the separation of functions prohibition of the Administrative ProcedureAct (5 U.S.C. 554(d)), no agency employee who is involved in investigatingor prosecuting the charges against an individual shall participate in thefinal decision. FRA does not envision the participation by the Administratorat any stage of the proceedings prior to appeal, including the theresholddecision to issue the notice of proposed disqualification. However, ifthe Administrator is involved in a decision to initiate a proposed disqualificationor in any decision on behalf of the agency during the pendency of the proposedaction, the Administrator shall recuse himself or herself from renderinga decision, and the appeal shall be referred to an agency official whowas not previously involved in the case. Further, any FRA employee whowas involved in issuing or prosecuting the proposed disqualification shallnot participate in the decision on appeal. 8. Should FRA maintain a roster of disqualification orders, past and/orcurrent and act as a clearinghouse for railroads who are contemplatinghiring or retaining an individual? The proposed rule, which remains substantively unchanged, seeks to enforcedisqualification orders by requiring: (1) A railroad employing or formerlyemploying a disqualified individual to disclose the terms and conditionsof the order to the individual's new or prospective employer railroad;(2) a railroad considering hiring an individual in a safety-sensitive positionto inquire from the individual's prior employer railroad whether the individualis serving under a disqualification order; and (3) a disqualified individualto inform his employer of the disqualification order and provide a copyof it to the employer and to inform a prospective employer railroad ofthe disqualification order and provide a copy thereto. NPRM and final rule,andSection; 209.331. Additionally, the proposed regulation prohibits a railroadfrom employing a person serving under a disqualification order in a safety-sensitiveposition and prohibits such a person from working in such a position. NPRMand final rule, andSection; 209.333. Finally, the proposed regulation imposescivil monetary penalties on railroads and individuals and authorizes amore severe disqualification for individuals violating the disclosure requirementsand/or committing the specified prohibited acts. NPRM and final rule, andSection;209.335. Two commenters suggested that FRA retain a listing of disqualifiedemployees. One stated that it should include only disqualification ordersin effect. The other recommended that it include all disqualification ordersimposed, both current and expired. Neither proposal is acceptable. Thelatter confuses the purpose of andSection;andSection; 209.331 through 209.335,which is to enforce disqualification orders in force, not to serve as arepository for previous actions. The former proposal raises some unresolvedPrivacy Act issues, and it would impose  additional administrative burdenson the FRA. FRA believes that the disqualification order enforcement procedure,as proposed and adopted, does not impose hardship on the railroads or theemployees involved. 9. Is it proper for FRA to disqualify an individual from performing safety-sensitivefunctions without the existence of FRA-mandated qualification standardsfor such individuals? Two commenters observed that FRA has promulgated no qualification standardsfor safety-sensitive functions. They argued that, because certain railroadsallegedly require employees to perform safety-sensitive functions withoutadequate training, on such individuals due process rights could be infringedby disqualification. FRA respectfully disagrees with that proposition.Whether FRA has or has not promulgated standards for railroad employeequalifications related to safety, as permitted by section 202(a) of theFRSA (45 U.S.C. 431(a)), is not germane to its authority granted underthe RSIA to disqualify railroad employees for violating FRA rules. Lackof training in the FRA regulations applicable to an employee's duties maybe viewed as an affirmative defense to charges that an employee committeda willful violation or a mitigating factor in fashioning an appropriatedisqualification order for a violation. It is essential to recognize, however,that a person who lacks the training necessary to perform his or her safety-sensitiveduties in compliance with FRA regulations is likely to be unfit to performsuch duties. It is certainly not in the public interest to retain an unqualifiedperson in a safety-sensitive position simply because he or she alleges(or proves) that the railroad failed to provide adequate training. Moreover,FRA retains the power to order any necessary training under sections 202(a)and 208(a) of the FRSA (45 U.S.C. 431(a) and 437(a)). The reason for disqualifyinga person who is unfit is not to discipline the person. It is to protecthis or her life, co-workers' lives and health, and the lives, health, andproperty of other persons. <ITAG tagnum="84">Section-by-Section Analysis </ITAG>The final rule contains substantial revisions in response to the writtencomments received, the testimony at the public hearing, and further reviewand reflection within FRA. Where the section citation in the final rulediffers from that in the NPRM, the latter citation is also provided. 1. Technical amendments are made to various sections of part 209, subpartA, to conform the general provisions for railroad safety enforcement proceedingsapplicable to subparts B (assessment of penalties under the Hazardous MaterialsTransportation Act) and C (issuance of compliance orders), and new subpartD (disqualification proceedings) is added. Specifically, andSection;andSection;209.1, 209.3, 209.7, 209.9, 209.13, and 209.15 are amended to reflect theinclusion of subpart D within part 209. Section 209.3 also includes a reviseddefinition of ``respondent'' and definitions for the terms ``motion,''``presiding officer,'' ``day,'' and ``pleading.'' Section 209.5 is amendedto permit service by first-class mail of motions and requests for admissionsand to require that a certificate of service accompany each pleading filedwith the agency. Section 209.7 is further amended to clarify that, oncea proceeding under subparts B, C, or D has begun, a subpoena or subpoenaduces tecum requiring the production of documents or other tangible evidencemay be issued only by the presiding officer. (Prior to institution of formalproceedings or in the context of enforcement actions not requiring formaladministrative hearings, the Chief Counsel retains the right to issue subpoenas,including deposition subpoenas, on his or her own initiative.) Proposed andSection;andSection; 209.315, governing motions, and 209.317, governingrequests for admission, have been moved from subpart D to subpart A andredesignated andSection;andSection; 209.17 and 209.6, respectively, becausethey set forth general procedural requirements applicable to all threerailroad safety enforcement proceedings covered in 49 CFR part 209: hazardousmaterials penalties (subpart B), compliance orders (subpart C), and disqualificationproceedings (subpart D). Proposed andSection; 209.321, governing depositions,was substantially revised, moved to subpart A, and redesignated andSection;209.8. In formulating rules for depositions pertaining to subpart D actions,FRA decided that to avoid confusion the requirements appropriate to depositionsshould be equally applicable to  proceedings under subparts B and C. 2. Section 209.6 (proposed as andSection; 209.317) governs the proceduresfor obtaining requests for admission of facts, the genuineness of documents,and the application of law to facts. Requests for admission do not involvethe participation of the presiding officer unless the parties cannot resolvecompliance issues that may arise. Sworn answers to requests for admissionor objections must be served within 30 days after receipt of the request.Failure to answer or object within that time period will result in an admissionof the matter requested. Objections to requests may be tested by filinga motion to compel with the presiding officer who has the authority tocompel an answer. Any matter admitted that is entered into the record isconclusively established. 3. Section 209.8 (proposed as andSection; 209.321) governs the procedurefor requesting, obtaining, and using depositions of witnesses in discoveryor at the hearing. As previously discussed, this section was substantiallyrevised to permit the taking of depositions as a discovery tool. Depositionsmay be used in the proceeding to contradict or impeach the testimony ofthe deponent as a witness. A deposition may also be used in the proceedingas evidence of the matters asserted therein, subject to valid objectionsmade at the deposition and later sustained by the presiding officer, andas permitted by Fed. R. Civ. Pro. 32 applied as though it were applicableto such proceedings on its face. Depositions may be taken of parties, andin conjunction with the requirements of section 209.7 governing subpoenas,of any other persons. Depositions may be taken only for good cause after a proper motion is grantedby the presiding officer and an appropriate order is entered. The rulestates that ``good cause'' exists when the information sought is relevantto the subject matter involved in the proceeding and (1) not obtainablefrom some other source that is more convenient, less burdensome, and lessexpensive or (2) not unreasonably cumulative, unduly burdensome, or undulyexpensive, taking into account the needs of the case, limitations on theparties' resources, and the importance of the issues in the case. See andSection;209.8(b). Objections to motions for depositions are governed by andSection; 209.17.The rule requires the presiding officer when granting a motion for depositionto give ten days' notice before the date of the deposition. The partiesmay agree to a shorter period. The time frame within which depositionsmay be taken in disqualification proceedings under part D is set forthin andSection; 209.313. See the text of the rule and the accompanying discussion,<T3>infra</T3>.4. Section 209.17 (proposed as andSection; 209.315) specifies the proceduresfor filing written motions (defined in andSection; 209.3(f)) and objectionsthereto. Objections must be filed within 10 days from receipt of the motion.The presiding officer may modify the time limit for objecting and ruleon oral motions. No time limit is prescribed for filing motions. If thatbecomes an issue in a proceeding, the presiding officer has the authorityto make appropriate rulings. 5. Section 209.301 states the purpose for subpart D, <T3>i.e.</T3>, the establishment of the rules of practice for disqualificationproceedings of railroad employees and agents from safety-sensitive functionsin the rail industry. It is the view of FRA that railroad accidents caused,directly or indirectly, by violations of safety regulations may be preventedor avoided by disqualifying individuals who have shown themselves to beunfit to perform the safety-sensitive functions described in andSection;209.303. Two purposes would be accomplished by suspending or barring suchan individual from these functions in the rail industry: First, the personwould be prevented from further violating safety regulations and the railroad'srules; and second, the person's suspension would serve to deter him orher and other railroad employees and agents from committing future violations.In the most serious cases, permanent disqualification could be deemed appropriate.The exercise of FRA's disqualification authority does not supersede therailroad's independent disciplinary authority or any employee's rightssecured under a collective bargaining agreement for review of a disciplinaryaction imposed under the railroad's independent authority. Those rightswould not be applicable, of course, to a suspension imposed by FRA underthis rule. Disqualification determinations and concomitant disqualificationorders are not intended to have any influence on subsequent disciplinaryproceedings or any sanctions by railroads against their employees. Further,a disqualification proceeding may not serve as a forum for a railroad employeeto challenge a prior disciplinary action that may have been taken for aviolation of the FRA regulation that is the subject of the disqualificationproceeding. FRA's disqualification authority is both narrower and broader than disciplineimposed by a railroad on an employee. It is narrower in the sense thatan employee may be disqualified only from performing safety-sensitive functions;the employee may remain in an active status with the railroad performingfunctions that are not designated as safety-sensitive. In a railroad disciplinaryproceeding, however, an employee may be suspended without pay from hisor her position. FRA's disqualification authority is broader in the sensethat FRA may bar a railroad employee from performing safety-sensitive functionswith any railroad, not just the employee's present employer. In summary,an FRA disqualification order is independent of any disciplinary actionthat may be taken by a railroad against an employee for violating an FRAregulation, rule, order, or standard. Likewise, a railroad disciplinaryaction is independent of any prior or subsequent disqualification order.6. Section 209.303 delineates the individuals in the rail industry whomay be subject to disqualification by specifying the functions they perform.This section lists those functions that FRA views to be safety-sensitivewithin the meaning and intent of the FRSA, as amended by the RSIA. First,railroad employees who are assigned to perform service under the Hoursof Service Act, 45 U.S.C. 61-64b, will be covered. Section 209.303(a).Employees covered by the Hours of Service Act include those engaged inor connected with the movement of any train (primarily engineers, brakemen,firemen, and conductors); those who dispatch, report, transmit, or receiveorders pertaining to or affecting train movements (primarily operatorsand dispatchers); and those engaged in installing, repairing, or maintainingsignal systems (primarily signalmen and certain electricians). Second, railroad employees and agents engaged in inspecting, installing,repairing or maintaining track and roadbeds will be subject to disqualificationfor safety regulation violations. Section 209.303(b)(1). Third, employeesengaged in inspecting, repairing, and maintaining locomotives, passengercars and freight cars will be covered. Section 209.303(b)(2). Fourth, employeeswho conduct training and testing of other employees required by FRA's safetyregulations will be covered. Section 209.303(b)(3). Fifth, railroad supervisors,managers, or agents who supervise or perform the foregoing safety-sensitivefunctions will be subject to disqualification for safety regulation violations.Section 209.303(c)(1)-(2). Sixth and finally, supervisors, managers, oragents who are in a position to direct the commission of violations ofFRA safety regulations may be disqualified from performing any of the foregoingfunctions and serving in any position in which they would have the abilityto direct subordinates to violate safety regulations. Section 209.303(c)(3).Section 209.303(c)(3) does not impose vicarious liability on supervisorsor managers for the rule violations of their subordinates. Such liabilityis not authorized under the RSIA. A supervisor and a manager may be disqualifiedfrom the functions described thereunder when he or she violates an FRArule, regulation, order, or standard. Moreover, the legislative historyof the RSIA shows Congress' intent that railroad supervisors and othermanagerial officials may be held liable for civil penalties for directingsubordinates to violate the law. See the statement of Senator Exon, oneof the primary sponsors of the RSlA, at 133 Cong. Rec. S15899 (daily ed.November 5, 1987) (cited in appendix A to part 209_Statement of AgencyPolicy Concerning Enforcement of the Federal Railroad Safety Laws, 53 FR52920, 52922, December 29, 1988). Under FRA's regulations, therefore, anindividual ``is liable for a civil penalty for a willful violation of,or for willfully causing the violation of, the safety statutes or regulations.''Appendix A to part 209, 53 FR 52920, 52921 (December 29, 1988).It is arguable that such egregious actions by railroad supervisors or managersshould also subject them to disqualification. It is evident that such intolerableconduct poses an insidious threat to rail safety and renders the culpablesupervisor or manager unfit to perform safety-sensitive functions. FRAwill decide on a case-by-case basis whether to initiate a disqualificationaction and/or impose a civil penalty for such conduct. It is FRA's position that a person who is disqualified from performingsafety-sensitive functions will be disqualified from performing all ofthe foregoing functions listed, not just the ones inherent to his or herjob class. For example, a disqualified engineer may not perform work forany railroad in any of the other safety-sensitive functions described.Nor may a supervisory track inspector supervise track inspectors or performsuch inspections, or any of the other enumerated safety-sensitive functions,for any railroad. The engineer and the supervisor could remain in an activeduty status with their employing railroad in a position that does not requirethe performance of safety-sensitive functions. The rule, however, neitherprecludes nor requires reassignment to a position that is not safety-sensitive.7. Section 209.305 sets forth the action that initiates a disqualificationproceeding. The FRA Chief Counsel, after an initial determination thatan alleged violation of a safety regulation establishes that an individualis unfit to perform safety-sensitive functions, issues a notice of proposeddisqualification to the individual. The Chief Counsel also provides a copyof the notice to the respondent's employing railroad. Paragraph (b) ofthis section defines the contents of the notice to include: A statementof the rule, regulation, order, or standard allegedly violated (<T3>e.g., </T3>identification of the regulation violated, the date of theviolation, and a brief description of the underlying facts); the factualallegations supporting the initial determination that the individual isunfit to perform safety-sensitive functions (<T3>e.g., </T3>identification of the relevant factors cited in andSection;209.329 and underlying facts in support thereof, which form the basis forthe terms and conditions of the disqualification order); the terms andconditions, including effective dates, of the proposed disqualificationorder (<T3>e.g., </T3>the duration and effective dates of any suspension or, iftermination of a suspension is conditioned upon a subsequent event otherthan the passage of time (completion of prescribed training, rehabilitation,respondent's application for permission to return to safety-sensitive service,etc.), identification of the event, if any, that will permit the individualto resume performance of safety-sensitive functions); and notice of theconsequences of the individual's failure to reply to the charges. Paragraph (b) also requires that the notice advise the individual of hisor her rights: To answer the charges in writing and provide supportingdocumentary evidence; to make an informal response to the Chief Counsel;to request an evidentiary hearing; and to be represented by counsel orother designated representative. Paragraph (c) requires the Chief Counsel to provide along with the noticea copy of the material supporting the charges. The material relied on generallywill include a copy of an FRA safety inspector's violation report and supportingexhibits, and may include other non-privileged information. Nothing inthis section precludes the Chief Counsel from presenting at a subsequenthearing under andSection; 209.325 any evidence of the charges set forth inthe notice that the Chief Counsel acquired after service thereof upon therespondent. The Chief Counsel is required, however, to furnish the respondentsuch after-acquired evidence at or, if feasible, before the prehearingconference required under andSection; 209.323. Failure to provide respondentsuch evidence when required would preclude its introduction at the hearing.Any disputes between the Chief Counsel and the respondent concerning after-acquiredevidence could be tested by a motion to strike the evidence. 8. Section 209.307(a) describes the individual's reply rights to a noticeof proposed disqualification and prescribes the time limit for submittingthe reply and the basis for requesting extensions. Within 30 days afterreceipt of service of the notice of proposed disqualification, the individualmust reply in writing to the charges, and he or she may submit documentaryevidence in support of the reply. In addition to submitting a written reply,the individual may make an informal response to the Chief Counsel or requestan evidentiary hearing. The individual may, of course, decide to forgosubmitting a written reply and stipulate to the charges and consent toimposition of the disqualification order set forth in the notice. In anyevent, FRA believes that the interests of all parties will be best servedby the efficient, expeditious conduct of these proceedings. The individualagainst whom charges have been made deserves a prompt determination asto his or her fitness, and the public safety demands no less.Although it is the FRA's policy to disfavor extension requests, the ChiefCounsel may extend the reply period under paragraph (b) when the ChiefCounsel concludes, for example, that the individual's right to reply tothe notice would be materially impaired if the extension were denied. Paragraph (c) prescribes the adverse consequences of an individual's failureto reply in writing to a notice of proposed disqualification. Specifically,it will be treated as a waiver of the individual's right to contest thecharges or the disqualification order. In that event, the Chief Counselmay find the individual unfit, issue and serve him or her with the disqualificationorder, and provide a copy of the order to the railroad by which the individualis employed. FRA realizes that this is a severe penalty for failure tofile a reply. However, FRA believes that treating a respondent's failureto file a reply as a waiver and imposing a disqualification order consistentwith the scope and duration of the notice will discourage a person fromignoring a notice and encourage a person who legitimately disputes theallegations in a notice to reply. 9. Section 209.309 prescribes the procedures for an informal response toa notice of proposed disqualification. The objective of the informal responseprovision is to provide an opportunity for the charged employee to settlethe charges without resort to litigation. If a settlement is not achieved,the parties may at least narrow their differences on the unresolved issuesand disputed facts. An individual who elects to make an informal responsemay submit information, including exculpatory material, mitigating factors,or extenuating circumstances, or discuss the matter with the Chief Counselor designated staff attorney. See andSection; 209.309(a) and (b). Based on the individual's written response and information provided atany conference, the Chief Counsel will consider the issues raised in thenotice of proposed disqualification and take one of the following actions:Dismiss the charges and notice of proposed disqualification; dismiss someof the charges and mitigate the proposed disqualification; mitigate theproposed disqualification; or sustain the charges and the proposed disqualification.See andSection; 209.309(d). Should the Chief Counsel sustain, in whole orin part, the charges and proposed disqualification and reach settlementof the charges with the respondent, the Chief Counsel shall issue an appropriatedisqualification order. No order, however, shall be issued unless the individualconsents to the imposition of the disqualification and waives, in writing,his or her right to a hearing. See andSection; 209.309(e). If the partiesare unable to reach a settlement within 30 days of service of the individual'sreply upon the Chief Counsel, the Chief Counsel will terminate negotiationsby serving respondent written notice of termination of settlement negotiations.See andSection; 209.309(f). The individual does not waive his right to a hearing by  filing a writtenresponse to the charges and requesting a conference with the Chief Counsel.Within 10 days after receipt of the notice of termination of settlementnegotiations, the individual may exercise that right. Failure to requesta hearing within that period, however, does constitute a waiver of therespondent's right to a hearing. Section 209.309(g). Although it is theFRA's policy to disfavor extension requests, the Chief Counsel may extendthe period under paragraph (g) for good cause shown. Section 209.309(h)10. Paragraph 209.311 governs an individual's request for a hearing. Underparagraph (a), an individual who requests a hearing must do so within 30days after receipt of the notice of proposed disqualification or, if theindividual pursues an informal response, within 10 days after receipt ofthe notice of termination of settlement negotiations. The written requestmust be signed by the individual and include, at a minimum, the followinginformation: Name, address, and phone number of the individual and hisor her representative, if any; a specific response to the charges, admitting,denying, or explaining each allegation contained in the notice of proposeddisqualification; and a description of the claims and defenses, that theindividual intends to raise at the hearing. A defense raised at the prehearingconference or the hearing, which was not identified in respondent's hearingrequest, will be subject to a motion to strike by the Chief Counsel. Absentcompelling reasons, the motion should be granted. Since discovery in these proceedings is limited, full disclosure of allclaims and defenses should be made early in the proceedings. The ChiefCounsel is limited to proving the charges and the propriety of the termsand conditions of the proposed order set forth in the notice of proposeddisqualification, or lesser charges or a less severe disqualification orderif any charges are terminated after respondent's informal response underandSection; 209.309. No new charges may be added, nor may a more severe disqualificationorder be proposed after such notice is served on the respondent. It isonly fitting that the respondent is bound by claims and defenses that areraised in his or her request for a hearing. Under paragraph (b), upon receipt of a proper hearing request, the ChiefCounsel shall arrange for the appointment of a presiding officer. Presidingofficers for disqualification hearings will be Administrative Law Judges,normally from the Department's Office of Hearings, who are assigned casesby the Chief Administrative Law Judge. The presiding officer assigned retainsthe authority to schedule the hearing.Questions have been raised concerning the role, if any, of the presidingofficer in the settlement of proposed disqualifications. Paragraph (c)provides that the Chief Counsel and the respondent in a case pending beforea presiding officer may agree to settle or dismiss a case without the approvalof the presiding officer. The Chief Counsel will promptly inform the presidingofficer when a case is settled or dismissed. 11. Section 209.313 contains general provisions governing discovery. Therewas no counterpart in the NPRM because FRA proposed to limit the methodsof discovery permitted to requests for admission (NPRM, andSection; 209.317;final rule, andSection; 209.6) and requests for production of documents andtangible evidence by subpoena under andSection; 209.7. As discussed in part3 of this section, however, in addition to those discovery devices, FRAdecided to permit the taking of depositions. With the addition of thatdiscovery device, FRA decided that limited controls had to be imposed overthe discovery scheme to avoid unnecessary delays in achieving a final outcomein the proceeding and to minimize the potential for abuses in the discoveryprocess. Paragraph (a) sets forth the FRA's concern that disqualification proceedingsbe conducted as expeditiously as possible with due regard to the rightsof the respondent and the Chief Counsel. Discovery should be employed onlyas necessary for a party to obtain relevant information necessary for thepreparation of his or her case. It should not be used by a party as a fishingexpedition, nor should it be used as an offensive weapon to delay the proceedingor to harass a party's opponent. On the other hand, legitimate discoveryrequests and orders should be complied with in a timely manner. The discoveryscheme set forth in these regulations is intended to be simple, timely,and relatively inexpensive. The reasonableness of any requests for discoveryshould be evaluated by those precepts, as well as the requirements establishedin the applicable sections for a specific discovery tool. See andSection;andSection;209.7 (subpoenas), 209.6 (requests for admission), and 209.8 (depositions).Discovery may be initiated only after the respondent requests a hearingunder andSection; 209.311. See paragraph (c). Discovery is not permittedduring a respondent's informal response to the notice of proposed disqualificationunder andSection; 209.309. The objective of the informal response is to settlethe charges against respondent without resort to litigation. To permitdiscovery during that phase of the proceedings could be disruptive andwould be inimical to that objective. Paragraph (d) provides strict timeframes for the conduct of discovery.Generally, discovery must be completed within 90 days after respondentrequests a hearing. Upon motion for good cause shown, however, a 30-dayextension may be granted by the presiding officer. Further, in what FRAbelieves will be an extremely rare situation, an additional 30-day extensionmay be granted when the party requesting the extension shows by clear andconvincing evidence that the party was unable to complete discovery withinthe 120-day time period permitted through no fault or lack of due diligenceof such party, and that denial of the request would result in irreparableprejudice. Paragraph (e) provides a method to compel a party to comply with discoveryrequests approved by the presiding officer through an order to compel_<T3>e.g.,</T3> an order to provide answers to specific questions posedin a deposition_or discovery orders_<T3>e.g.,</T3> an order directing a person to submit to a deposition underandSection; 209.8. Sanctions that may be imposed by a presiding officer arelimited to the particular failure of the party. This will avoid completedismissal of the case based solely on the Chief Counsel's failure to participatein discovery. Similarly, a disqualification order will not be issued basedsolely on a respondent's failure to participate in discovery. 12. Section 209.315 (proposed as andSection; 209.319) provides that onlythe presiding officer may issue subpoenas under andSection; 209.7 after disqualificationproceedings have been initiated by the issuance and service of a noticeof proposed disqualification under andSection; 209.305.13. Section 209.317 (proposed as andSection; 209.313) specifies the materialcomprising the official record in each disqualification proceeding_<T3>i.e., </T3>notice of proposed  disqualification, reply, exhibits, hearingtranscript, pleadings, stipulations, admissions, rulings, and orders. Ifno hearing is held because a settlement is reached and a stipulated disqualificationorder is issued, the record would consist of the settlement agreement,the order, the notice of proposed disqualification, supporting documentation(generally a violation report with supporting exhibits), and the individual'sreply. 14. Section 209.319 (proposed as andSection; 209.323) establishes the requirementfor, and the minimum subject matter of, a prehearing conference, whichmust be conducted within 150 days of respondent's request for a hearingunder andSection; 209.311. One of the primary purposes of a prehearing conferenceis to shorten the hearing, or eliminate it if settlement is achieved. Sincediscovery is limited in disqualification proceedings, it also gives theparties an opportunity to simplify the issues, enter into stipulations,and exchange witness lists and exhibits that are approved by the presidingofficer. Because it will be conducted at least 10 days before the hearing,the parties will have adequate time to deal with any issues or evidenceraised at the prehearing conference. For example, any evidence acquiredby the Chief Counsel after issuance of the notice of proposed disqualificationwill be provided at the conference, if it was not provided earlier. 15. Section 209.321 (proposed as andSection; 209.325) contains the requirementsfor disqualification hearings conducted by administrative law judges. Underparagraph (a), the presiding officer is required to begin the hearing within180 days of the respondent's hearing request, and give the parties at least20 days notice of the time and place of the hearing. The presiding officerretains the authority to determine the site of the hearing. Naturally,motions for a specific hearing site or for a change of venue may be madeby the parties, usually at the prehearing conference. Also under paragraph(a), witnesses will testify under oath, a verbatim transcript of the hearingwill be made, and the hearing shall be open to the public. The presidingofficer retains authority to close all or any part of the hearing if heor she determines that to do so would be in the best interests of the public,the respondent, a witness, or any affected person. Any order of closuremust set forth the reasons therefor. As a general rule, public hearingsare in the best interests of the individual and society. There may be rareexceptions, however, when a part of the proceeding is appropriately conductedout of the public eye. Paragraphs (b) and (e) prescribe the broad powers of the presiding officerin controlling the proceeding and conducting the hearing. The powers ofthe presiding officer are based on, and consistent with, the powers outlinedin the Administrative Procedure Act. Paragraph (c) sets forth the burden and standard of proof for the ChiefCounsel. The Chief Counsel has the burden of production and persuasionas to the facts alleged in the notice of proposed disqualification, respondent'sunfitness and the reasonableness of the terms of the proposed disqualification.However, when the Chief Counsel proves that the individual committed awillful violation of one of the requirements of 49 CFR parts 213 through236, excluding the record keeping and reporting requirements of parts 225,228, and 233, the individual is presumed to be unfit to perform safety-sensitivefunctions. See andSection; 209.329(a). The presumption is rebuttable. Itdoes not shift the Chief Counsel's burden of proof (<T3>i.e. </T3>the risk of nonpersuasion) to the respondent; it does, however,impose on the respondent the burden of going forward with evidence to rebutthe presumption. The individual may, therefore, proffer evidence to rebutthe finding of his or her unfitness. In addition, the individual may profferevidence in mitigation of the proposed disqualification. FRA's definition of a ``willful'' violation is discussed in detail in appendixA to part 209 of 49 CFR. See 53 FR 52918, 52921-52922, (December 29, 1988).Briefly, FRA considers a ``willful'' act to be one that is an intentional,voluntary act committed either with knowledge of the relevant law or withreckless disregard for whether the act violated the requirements of thelaw. Consequently, proof that conduct  constitutes a violation does notrequire a showing of evil purpose (as is sometimes required in criminallaw) or actual knowledge of the law. A level of culpability higher thansimple negligence, however, must be established. A willful violation alsorequires actual or constructive knowledge of the facts constituting theviolation. It is FRA's firm belief that an individual who willfully violatesa safety requirement is generally not fit to perform safety-sensitive functionsin the rail industry. For example, an employee or supervisor who is responsiblefor providing blue signal protection to other employees and who intentionallyand voluntarily fails to display a blue signal when required to do so by49 CFR 218.25, is unfit to perform safety-sensitive functions. Similarly,a locomotive engineer who intentionally and voluntarily reports for dutyunder the influence of alcohol in contravention of 49 CFR 219.101(a)(2)(i)is unfit to operate a locomotive. The standard of proof for the Chief Counselis the preponderance of the evidence, the traditional standard used inmost administrative and civil judicial proceedings. For example, it isthe standard of proof used in proceedings before the MSPB to remove andsuspend, among other things, certain categories of employees from the federalservice.5 U.S.C. 7701(c)(1)(b). A generally accepted definition of ``preponderanceof the evidence'' is set out in the MSPB's regulations: ``* * * that degreeof relevant evidence which a reasonable person, considering the recordas a whole, would accept as sufficient to find that a contested fact ismore likely to be true than untrue.'' 5 CFR 1201.56(c)(3). Paragraph (d) sets out the respondent's hearing rights and responsibilities.The respondent may, either personally or through a representative, conductcross-examination and offer evidence in defense of the allegations or inmitigation of the proposed disqualification. The respondent has the burdenof proof, by a preponderance of the evidence, as to any affirmative defense.For example, a statutory affirmative defense to a charge that respondent'salleged violation of an FRA-prescribed rule, regulation, order, or standardwas willful is to show that the violation was committed in obedience tothe direct order of a railroad supervisor or other official, under protestcommunicated to the supervisor. See section 3(a)(3) of the RSIA. FRA recognizes that there is language in the legislative history of theRSIA that implies it would not be appropriate to initiate a disqualificationproceeding against any individual who violates an FRA regulation in obedienceto a direct order from a railroad official. See the statement of SenatorExon at 133 Cong. Rec. S15899 (daily ed. November 5, 1987) (cited in appendixA to part 209_Statement of Agency Policy Concerning Enforcement of theFederal Railroad Safety Laws, 53 FR 52920, 52922, December 29, 1988). However,the statute expressly provides that a person is exonerated from a chargeof willfully violating a safety regulation if he or she ``acted pursuantto a direct order of a railroad official or supervisor, under protest communicatedto the supervisor.'' RSIA, section 3(a)(3)(C). A civil penalty may onlybe imposed on an individual for willful violations. RSIA, section 3(a)(3)(A).Consequently, if an employee obeys a direct order that violates a regulationand protests that action to the appropriate railroad official, the employeewill not be subject to a civil penalty. However, the RSIA itself does notprovide, expressly or impliedly, that an individual who obeys an orderwill be relieved of all responsibility. For example, under the RSIA, evenif a person obeyed an order to perform an act that violates a safety regulation,he or she could still be held culpable if the person did not protest theaction to the supervisor who gave the order. Similarly, an individual whocomplied with a direct order to violate the blue signal rules resultingin the death of an employee who should have been protected by such signalsmay, depending on the individual's appreciation for the likelihood of sucha result, have demonstrated unfitness for safety sensitive service. Congress' purpose in giving the FRA authority to bar an individual fromsafety-sensitive functions was to remove the risk unfit individuals poseto their co-workers and the public. There could be egregious circumstanceswhere an employee who obeys an order resulting in a rule violation is,nonetheless, unfit to perform safety-sensitive functions_<T3>e.g.</T3>, an engineer who is under the influence of alcohol is orderedto operate a locomotive and consents to do so. Hopefully, FRA will neverbe confronted with such a situation. But if it is, it preserves its authorityto take action necessary to protect the public and the malefactor's co-workers.16. Section 209.323 (proposed as andSection; 209.327) prescribes the requirementsfor issuance and contents of the initial decision and order by the presidingofficer. The decision of the presiding officer may take one of three forms:(1) Dismissal of all or some of the charges set forth in notice of proposeddisqualification; (2) sustain all or some of the charges and proposed disqualification;or (3) sustain all or some of the charges, but impose a disqualificationless severe than the one proposed. Paragraph (a). If the presiding officer'sdecision sustains any of the charges against the respondent, the presidingofficer shall issue an appropriate disqualification order. If some chargesare dismissed, the disqualification order shall specify which charges aredismissed. Should the presiding officer dismiss all charges, he or sheshall issue a dismissal order. Paragraph (b). In addition to including either a disqualification or dismissal order,the initial decision shall contain findings of fact and conclusions oflaw and the reasons therefor, which shall be based on the evidence andargument presented in the record, the terms and conditions of any disqualificationorder, the date the decision shall become final_35 days after issuanceof the decision, unless an appeal is filed_and the parties' appeal rightsto the Administrator. Paragraph (c). Under paragraph (d), the initial decision shall be served upon the respondentand the Chief Counsel. The Chief Counsel shall provide a copy of it tothe railroad who employed the individual when the notice of proposed disqualificationwas issued, since a copy of that notice was provided to the railroad underandSection; 209.305. FRA recognizes that it is possible that the individualwill not be employed by that same railroad when the presiding officer'sdecision is rendered. He or she could have one or more employers betweenthe issuance of the notice of proposed disqualification and the issuanceof the disqualification order. To obviate the Chief Counsel's need to ascertainthe identity of the respondent's employer when the disqualification orderis issued, it should be noted that the respondent is also required to notifyhis employer railroad of the issuance of such an order under andSection;209.331(c).Consequently, if the individual is employed by a different railroad whenthe order is issued, that railroad should receive a copy of it from theindividual. 17. Section 209.325 (proposed as andSection; 209.323 (e)) describes whenthe initial decision rendered under andSection; 209.325 is final. The presidingofficer's decision becomes the final agency decision 35 days after itsissuance, unless any party files an administrative appeal to the FRA Administratorunder andSection; 209.327. Should a party file a timely appeal, the orderissued with the initial decision, either disqualification or dismissal,is stayed pending final disposition of the case on appeal. If no timelyappeal is filed, the presiding officer's decision becomes the final agencyaction, and it is not subject to further review within the Department.Since an appeal of an initial decision by an aggrieved respondent is permissive,rather than mandatory, the decision when final is subject to judicial reviewin an appropriate United States District Court under 28 U.S.C. 1331 and5 U.S.C. 701-706. Section 209.325 also provides that an initial decision that has not beenappealed is not precedent in subsequent disqualification proceedings. Neithera presiding officer nor the Administrator is required to decide any issuein conformity with any unappealed initial decision that did not resultin a final decision and order under andSection; 209.327(f). There is no intent,however, to preclude a presiding officer from using similar reasoning oranalysis in similar disqualification actions. 18. Section 209.327 contains the procedures a party must follow to filean appeal of the presiding officer's initial decision with the FRA Administrator.For purposes of this rule, an appeal connotes a brief on appeal, not merelya notice of appeal. Any party may file an appeal with the Administratorwithin 35 days of issuance of the initial decision. Upon motion for goodcause shown, an extension of the filing period may be granted by the Administrator.The appeal must set forth objections to the initial decision, discuss applicablelaws or regulations, and if he or she relies on evidence in the record,it should be clearly identified. An opposing party may file a reply briefwithin 25 days of service of the appeal. If the reply depends on evidencecontained in the record, it should also be clearly identified. For example,if the appeal or reply relies on oral testimony taken at the hearing, theappellant or appellee should include the pertinent page numbers from thehearing transcript. There is no right to oral argument on appeal. Oral argument will be permittedonly if the Administrator finds that it is necessary to develop the issueson appeal. If an oral argument is allowed, the Administrator shall fashionand issue an appropriate order setting forth the time, place, scope, andother procedures that will be followed. Section 209.327 also prescribes the Administrator's authority on appeal.On appeal, the Administrator possesses all the powers that the presidingofficer had in making the initial decision. He or she may affirm, reverse,alter, or modify the initial decision. Further, the Administrator may remandthe case to the presiding official to take further testimony or evidenceor make further findings and conclusions. Initial decisions that have been appealed to the Administrator and resultin a decision and order of the Administrator constitute final agency ordersand are subject to judicial review in an appropriate United States DistrictCourt under 28 U.S.C. 1331 and 5 U.S.C. 701-706. 19. Section 209.329, paragraph (a), establishes the rebuttable presumption,as discussed above, that proof of an individual's willful violation ofany of the requirements of 49 CFR parts 213 through 236, excluding parts225, 228, and 233, establishes that individual's unfitness. Paragraph (b) sets forth an illustrative list of factors to be used bythe Chief Counsel, the presiding officer, and the Administrator in determiningan individual's fitness for performing safety-sensitive functions and,if the individual is found to be unfit, in fashioning an appropriate disqualificationorder. Not all of the factors listed may be relevant in every case. Forexample, in determining whether the respondent who violated a regulationis unfit to perform safety-sensitive functions, the following factors usuallywould be relevant: Factor one (nature, seriousness, and frequency of theviolation), factor two (adverse impact or potential adverse impact of theviolation on the health and safety of persons and safety of property),factor six (whether the respondent was on notice of any safety regulationsthat were violated or whether he or she had been previously warned aboutthe conduct in question), and factor seven (the respondent's past recordof committing violations of safety regulations, including previous FRAwarnings issued, disqualifications imposed, civil penalties assessed, railroaddisciplinary actions, and criminal convictions therefor). Those same factorswould be relevant to fashioning an appropriate disqualification order,but they may not be the only factors relevant. For example, the consistencyof the penalty with disqualification orders issued against other individualsfor the same or similar violations (factor five) and the civil penaltyscheduled for violation of the regulation in question (factor eight) wouldalso be relevant in imposing an appropriate disqualification order. Insome cases some of the factors would not be relevant to any issue in theproceeding. If the violation in issue involved an operating practice, forexample, railroad and industry maintenance standards (factors three andfour) would not be relevant to either a fitness determination or a disqualificationorder. Given the sheer newness of this remedy, the seriousness of a disqualificationaction against an individual, and the myriad considerations that shouldbe taken into account in determining an individual's fitness and developingan appropriate disqualification order, FRA is not at this time proposinga general schedule of offenses and penalties for disqualification proceedings.There may be aggravating factors involved in an individual's violationof a safety requirement that warrant the imposition of a lengthy or permanentdisqualification. For example, an engineer who is drinking an alcoholicbeverage while operating a locomotive in violation of 49 CFR 219.101(a)is clearly unfit and could be barred from employment as an engineer orin any other position involving the performance of safety-sensitive functionsfor a lengthy period of time. On the other hand, there may be mitigatingfactors involved in an individual's violation of a safety requirement thatwarrant the imposition of a lesser disqualification period. For example,a railroad inspector who negligently fails to conduct, a required trackinspection in violation of 49 CFR 213.33 may be disqualified for a relativelybrief period if the violation was the inspector's first offense, and undiscovereddefects in the track were relatively minor and posed little potential adverseimpact on the safety of persons. 20. Section 209.331, paragraph (a), imposes a requirement on an individualwho is subject to a disqualification order to disclose the existence ofthe order and to provide a copy of it to his or her current employer ora prospective employer. Any individual who violates this requirement maybe subject to another disqualification proceeding in which FRA will seekto bar permanently the individual from performing safety-sensitive functionsand, if the violation is willful, the individual may be assessed a civilpenalty of between $1,000 and $5,000 per Violation. See andSection; 209.335(a).Paragraphs (a) and (b) impose disclosure requirements on railroads in aneffort to prevent employees and agents from working in safety-sensitivepositions for railroads other than the employee's present employer. Forexample, if a person is serving under a 120 day disqualification order,that person will be prohibited from working in the rail industry in anyof the safety-sensitive functions identified in andSection; 209.303. If theindividual applies for a position involving the performance of safety-sensitivefunctions with any railroad, the railroad that is considering hiring himor her must inquire of the person's former employer as to whether he orshe is presently subject to a disqualification order. Upon receipt of suchan inquiry, the person's former employer must inform the inquiring railroadof the terms and conditions of any effective disqualification order. Failureof any railroad or other employer in the rail industry to meet the requirementsof this section shall subject them, under andSection; 209.335(b), to a civilpenalty of between $5,000 and $10,000 per violation. 21. Section 209.333 prohibits an individual who is subject to a disqualificationorder from working for a railroad in violation of the terms and conditionsof the order. In addition, railroads must not allow such individuals towork in any manner inconsistent with the order. For example, a person whois subject to a disqualification order suspending the person for 120 daysand requiring the completion of a specified training program may not beemployed by a railroad in a position involving the performance of safety-sensitivefunctions until the expiration of 120 days and completion of the program.Violations of these provisions will subject the offending individuals andrailroads to the sanctions set forth in andSection; 209.335. <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Impact </ITAG>E.O. 12291 and DOT Regulatory Policies and Procedures This rule has been evaluated in accordance with existing policies and procedures,and is considered to be non-major under Executive Order 12291 but significantunder DOT policies and procedures (44 FR 1l034, February 26, 1979). Therule would not have any direct or indirect economic impact because it doesnot impose any additional regulatory burden on either railroads or individuals.Therefore, no further analysis of economic impact is required. The potentialcost to an individual for participating in a disqualification proceedingand the imposition of a disqualification may and, hopefully, will serveas a deterrent to individuals who might contemplate violating safety regulations.These disqualifications, therefore, may result in the avoidance of substantialcosts associated with railroad accidents caused, directly or indirectly,by violations of safety regulations. Regulatory Flexibility Act FRA certifies that this rule will not have a significant economic impacton a substantial number of small entities. There are no direct or indirecteconomic impacts for small units of government, businesses, or other organizations.State rail agencies remain free to participate in the administration ofFRA's rules but are not required to do so. Paperwork Reduction Act The rule contains information collection requirements in andSection; 209.331.FRA is submitting these information collection requirements to the Officeof Management and Budget for approval under the Paperwork Reduction Actof 1980 (44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq.</T3>). The public reporting burden for the collection of informationunder andSection; 209.331 is estimated to average 30 minutes per response,including the time for reviewing instructions, searching existing datasources, gathering and maintaining the data needed, and completing andreviewing the collection of information. Send comments regarding this burdenestimate or any other aspect of this collection of information, includingsuggestions for reducing this burden, to Gloria D. Swanson, Office of Safety,RRS-21, Federal Railroad Administration, 400 Seventh St., SW., Washington,DC 20590; and to Ed Clark, Regulatory Policy Branch (OMB No. 2130-New),Office of Management and Budget, New Executive Office Bldg., 726 JacksonPlace, NW., Washington, DC 20503. Copies of any such comments should alsobe submitted to the docket of this rulemaking at the address provided above.<ITAG tagnum="84">Environmental Impact </ITAG>FRA has evaluated these regulations in accordance with its procedures forensuring full consideration of the potential environmental impacts of FRAactions, as required by the National Environmental Policy Act and relateddirectives. This notice meets the criteria that establish this as a non-majoraction for environmental purposes. <ITAG tagnum="84">Federalism Implications </ITAG>This action has been analyzed in accordance with the principles and criteriacontained in Executive Order 12612, and it has been determined that thefinal rule does not have sufficient federalism implications to warrantthe preparation of a Federalism Assessment. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 49 CFR Part 209 </ITAG>Railroad safety, Railroad safety enforcement procedures. <ITAG tagnum="84">The Final Rule </ITAG>In consideration of the foregoing, part 209, title 49, Code of FederalRegulations is amended as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 209_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for part 209 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 45 U.S.C. 6, 10 and 13, as amended; 45 U.S.C. 34, asamended; 45 U.S.C. 43, as amended; 45 U.S.C. 64a, as amended; 45 U.S.C.431, 437, 438, and 439, as amended; 49 U.S.C. 103(c); 49 App. U.S.C. 26(h),as amended; 49 App. U.S.C. 1655(e), as amended; Pub. L. 100-342; and 49CFR 1.49(c), (d), (f), (g), and (m).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Subparts B and C also issued under 49 App. U.S.C. 1802, 1804, 1808,1809, and 1810; and 49 CFR 1.49(s).</ITAG>2. The table of contents is amended to add new entries as follows:<ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart A_General </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.6 Requests for admission </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.8 Depositions in formal proceedings </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.17 Motions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart D_Disqualification Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.301 Purpose and scope </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.303 Coverage </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.305 Notice of proposed disqualification </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.307 Reply </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.309 Informal Response </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.311 Request for hearing </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.313 Discovery </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.315 Subpoenas </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.317 Official record </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.319 Prehearing conference </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.321 Hearing </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.323 Initial decision </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.325 Finality of decision </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.327 Appeal </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.329 Assessment considerations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.331 Enforcement of disqualification order </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.333 Prohibitions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">209.335 Penalties</ITAG>3. Section 209.1 is amended by revising paragraph (b) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) Exercise of the authority vested in the Secretary by the Federal RailroadSafety Act of 1970, 45 U.S.C. 421, 431-441, as amended by the Rail SafetyImprovement Act of 1988, Pub. L. 100-342 (June 22, 1988) (49 CFR 1.49(m));and <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>4. Section 209.3 is amended by revising paragraph (e) and adding new paragraphs(f) through (i) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(e) ``Respondent'' means a person upon whom the FRA has served a noticeof probable violation, notice of investigation, or notice of proposed disqualification.(f) ``Motion'' means a request to a presiding officer to take a particularaction. (g) ``Presiding Officer'' means any person authorized to preside over anyhearing or to make a decision on the record, including an administrativelaw judge. (h) ``Day'' means calendar day. (i) ``Pleading'' means any written submission setting forth claims, allegations,arguments, or evidence. 5. Section 209.5 is amended by adding new paragraphs (d) and (e) to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2O9.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Service. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) Service of requests for admission and motions may be made by first-classmail, postage prepaid. (e) Each pleading must be accompanied by a certificate of service specifyinghow and when service was made. 6. Section 209.6 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requests for admission. </ITAG>(a) A party to any proceeding under subpart B, C, or D of this part mayserve upon any other party written requests for the admission of the genuinenessof any relevant documents identified within the request, the truth of anyrelevant matters of fact, and the application of law to the facts as setforth in the request. (b) Each matter of which an admission is requested shall be deemed to beadmitted unless, within 30 days after receipt of the request, the partyto whom the request is directed serves upon the party requesting the admissiona written answer under oath or objection addressed to the matter, signedby the party. (c) The sworn answer shall specifically admit or deny the matter or setforth in detail the reasons why the answering party cannot truthfully admitor deny the matter. If an objection is made, the reasons therefor shallbe stated. (d) Any matter admitted under this section is conclusively establishedunless the presiding official permits withdrawal or amendment of the admissionfor good cause shown. (e) Upon motion, the presiding officer may order any party to respond toa request for admission. 7. Section 209.7 is amended by revising paragraphs (a) and (b) to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Subpoena; witness fees. </ITAG>(a) The Chief Counsel may issue a subpoena on his or her own initiativein any matter related to enforcement of the railroad safety laws. However,where a proceeding under subpart B, C, or D of this part has been initiated,only the presiding officer may issue subpoenas, and only upon the writtenrequest of any party to the proceeding who makes an adequate showing thatthe information sought will materially advance the proceeding. (b) A subpoena may require attendance of a witness at a deposition or hearingor the production of documentary or other tangible evidence in the possessionor control of the person served, or both. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>8. Section 209.8 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.8 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Depositions in formal proceedings. </ITAG>(a) Any party to a proceeding under subpart B, C, or D of this part maytake the testimony of any person, including a party, by deposition uponoral examination on order of the presiding officer following the grantingof a motion under paragraph (b) of this section. Depositions may be takenbefore any disinterested person who is authorized by law to administeroaths. The attendance of witnesses may be compelled by subpoena as providedin andSection; 209.7 and, for proceedings under subpart D of this part, andSection;209.315. (b) Any party desiring to take the deposition of a witness shall file andserve a written motion setting forth the name of the witness; the date,time, and place of the deposition; the subject matter of the witness' expectedtestimony; whether any party objects to the taking of the deposition; andthe reasons for taking such deposition. Such motion shall be granted onlyupon a showing of good cause. Good cause exists to take a person's depositionwhen the information sought is relevant to the subject matter involvedin the proceeding and: (1) The information is not obtainable from some other source that is moreconvenient, less burdensome, and less expensive; or (2) The request is not unreasonably cumulative, unduly burdensome, or undulyexpensive, taking into account the needs of the case, limitations on theparties' resources, and the importance of the issues in the case. (c) Such notice as the presiding officer shall order will be given forthe taking of a deposition, but this shall not be less than 10 days' writtennotice unless the parties agree to a shorter period. (d) Each witness testifying upon deposition shall be sworn and the adverseparty shall have the right to cross-examine. The questions propounded andthe answers thereto, together with all objections made, shall be reducedto writing, subscribed by the witness, and certified by the reporter. (e) Depositions taken under this section may be used for discovery, tocontradict or impeach the testimony of the deponent as a witness, or asevidence in the proceeding as permitted by paragraph (f) of this sectionand in accordance with the limitations of Fed. R. Civ. Pro. 32 as thoughit were applicable to these proceedings. (f) Subject to such objections to the questions and answers as were notedat the time of taking the deposition and as would be valid were the witnesspersonally present and testifying, such deposition may be offered in evidenceby any party to the proceeding. 9. Section 209.9 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.9 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Filing. </ITAG>All materials filed with FRA or any FRA officer in connection with a proceedingunder subpart B, C, or D of this part shall be submitted in duplicate tothe Assistant Chief Counsel for Safety, (RCC-30), Office of Chief Counsel,Federal Railroad Administration, 400 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC20590, except that documents produced in accordance with a subpoena shallbe presented at the place and time specified by the subpoena. 10. Section 209.13 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.13 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Consolidation. </ITAG>At the time a matter is set for hearing under subpart B, C, or D of thispart, the Chief Counsel may consolidate the matter with any similar matter(s)pending against the same respondent or with any related matter(s) pendingagainst other respondent(s) under the same subpart. However, on certificationby the presiding officer that a consolidated proceeding is unmanageableor otherwise undesirable, the Chief Counsel will rescind or modify theconsolidation. 11. Section 209.15 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Rules of evidence. </ITAG>The Federal Rules of Evidence for United States Courts and Magistratesshall be employed as general guidelines for proceedings under subpartsB, C, and D of this part. However, all relevant and material evidence shallbe received into the record. 12. Section 209.17 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.17 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Motions. </ITAG>Motions shall be in writing, filed with the presiding officer, and copiesserved upon the parties in accordance with andSection; 209.5, except thatoral motions may be made during the course of any hearing or appearancebefore the presiding officer. Each motion shall state the particular order,ruling, or action desired and the grounds therefor. Unless otherwise specifiedby the presiding officer, any objection to a written motion must be filedwithin 10 days after receipt of the motion. 13. Subpart D, consisting of andSection;andSection; 209.301 to 209.335, isadded to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Disqualification Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.301 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and scope. </ITAG>(a) This subpart prescribes the rules of practice for administrative proceedingsrelating to the determination of an individual's fitness for performingsafety-sensitive functions under andSection; 209(f) of the Federal RailroadSafety Act of 1970 (45 U.S.C. 438(f)). (b) The purpose of this subpart is to prevent accidents and casualtiesin railroad operations that result from the presence in the work forceof railroad employees, including managers and supervisors, and agents ofrailroads who have demonstrated their unfitness to perform the safety-sensitivefunctions described in andSection; 209.303 by violating any rule, regulation,order or standard prescribed by FRA. Employees and agents who evidencesuch unfitness may be disqualified, under specified terms and conditions,temporarily or permanently, from performing such safety-sensitive functions.(c) This subpart does not preempt a railroad from initiating disciplinaryproceedings and imposing disciplinary sanctions against its employees,including managers and supervisors, under its collective bargaining agreementsor in the normal and customary manner. Disqualification determinationsmade under this subpart shall have no effect on prior or subsequent disciplinaryactions taken against such employees by railroads. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.303 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Coverage. </ITAG>This subpart applies to the following individuals: (a) Railroad employees who are assigned to perform service subject to theHours of Service Act (45 U.S.C. 61-64b) during a duty tour, whether ornot the person has performed or is currently performing such service, andany person who performs such service. (b) Railroad employees or agents who: (1) Inspect, install, repair, or maintain track and roadbed; (2) Inspect, repair or maintain, locomotives, passenger cars, and freightcars;(3) Conduct training and testing of employees when the training or testingis required by the FRA's safety regulations; or (c) Railroad managers, supervisors, or agents when they: (1) Perform the safety-sensitive functions listed in paragraphs (a) and(b) of this section; (2) Supervise and otherwise direct the performance of the safety-sensitivefunctions listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section; or (3) Are in a position to direct the commission of violations of any ofthe requirements of parts 213 through 236 of this title. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.305 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of proposed disqualification. </ITAG>(a) FRA, through the Chief Counsel, begins a disqualification proceedingby serving a notice of proposed disqualification on the respondent charginghim or her with having violated one or more rules, regulations, orders,or standards promulgated by FRA, which render the respondent unfit to performsafety-sensitive functions described in andSection; 209.303. (b) The notice of proposed disqualification issued under this section shallcontain: (1) A statement of the rule(s), regulation(s), order(s), or standard(s)that the respondent is alleged to have violated; (2) A statement of the factual allegations that form the basis of the initialdetermination that the respondent is not fit to perform safety-sensitivefunctions; (3) A statement of the effective date, duration, and other conditions,if any, of the disqualification order; (4) A statement of the respondent's right to answer the charges in writingand furnish affidavits and any other documentary evidence in support ofthe answer; (5) A statement of the respondent's right to make an informal responseto the Chief Counsel; (6) A statement of the respondent's right to request a hearing and theprocedures for requesting a hearing; (7) A statement of the respondent's right to counsel or other designatedrepresentative; and (8) Notice of the consequences of the respondent's failure to take anyof the actions described in andSection; 209.307(a). (c) The Chief Counsel shall enclose with the notice of proposed disqualificationa copy of the material that is relied on in support of the charges. Nothingin this section precludes the Chief Counsel from presenting at a subsequenthearing under andSection; 209.321 any evidence of the charges set forth inthe notice that the Chief Counsel acquires after service thereof on therespondent. The Chief Counsel, however, shall serve a copy of any suchevidence on the respondent at or before the prehearing conference requiredunder andSection; 209.319. Failure to furnish such evidence to respondentat or before the prehearing conference bars its introduction at the hearing.(d) The Chief Counsel shall provide a copy of the notice of proposed disqualificationto the railroad that employs the respondent. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.307 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reply. </ITAG>(a) Within 30 days after receipt of the notice of proposed disqualificationissued under andSection; 209.305, the respondent shall reply in writing tothe charges. The respondent may furnish affidavits and any other documentaryevidence in support of the reply. Further, the respondent may elect to_(1) Stipulate to the charges and consent to the imposition of the disqualificationorder under the conditions set forth in the notice; (2) Make an informal response as provided in andSection; 209.309; or (3) Request a hearing as provided in andSection; 209.311. (b) The Chief Counsel may extend the reply period for good cause shown,provided the request for extension is served before the expiration of theperiod provided in paragraph (a) of this section. (c) Failure of the respondent to reply to the notice of proposed disqualificationwithin the period provided in paragraph (a) of this section or an extensionthereto provided under paragraph (b) of this section constitutes a waiverof the respondent's right to appear and contest the charges or the proposeddisqualification. Respondent's failure to reply authorizes the Chief Counsel,without further notice to the respondent, to find the respondent unfitfor the performance of the safety-sensitive functions described in andSection;209.303 and to order the respondent disqualified from performing them forthe period and under the other conditions described in the notice of proposeddisqualification. The Chief Counsel shall serve respondent with the disqualificationorder and provide a copy of the order to the railroad by which the respondentis employed. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.309 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Informal Response. </ITAG>(a) If the respondent elects to make an informal response to a notice ofproposed disqualification, he or she shall submit to the Chief Counselsuch written explanations, information, or other materials as respondentmay desire in answer to the charges or in mitigation of the proposed disqualification.(b) The respondent may include in an informal written response a requestfor a conference. Upon receipt of such a request, the Chief Counsel shallarrange for a conference at a time and place designated by the Chief Counsel.(c) Written explanations, information, or materials submitted by the respondentand relevant information presented during any conference held under thissection shall be considered by the Chief Counsel in reviewing the noticeof proposed disqualification, including the question of the respondent'sfitness and the conditions of any disqualification that may be imposed.(d) After consideration of an informal response, including any relevantinformation presented at a conference, the Chief Counsel shall take oneof the following actions: (1) Dismiss all the charges and terminate the notice of proposed disqualification;(2) Dismiss some of the charges and mitigate the proposed disqualification;(3) Mitigate the proposed disqualification; or (4) Sustain the charges and proposed disqualification. (e) Should the Chief Counsel sustain, in whole or in part, the chargesand proposed disqualification and reach settlement with the respondent,the Chief Counsel shall issue an appropriate disqualification order reflectingthe settlement and shall provide a copy of that order to the railroad bywhich the respondent is employed. The duration of the disqualificationperiod may be less than, but shall be no greater than, the period set forthin the notice. Any settlement reached shall be evidenced by a written agreement,which shall include declarations from the respondent stipulating to thecharges contained in the disqualification order, consenting to the impositionof the disqualification under the conditions set forth in the disqualificationorder, and waiving his or her right to a hearing. (f) If settlement of the charges against the respondent is not achieved,the Chief Counsel shall terminate settlement discussions no later than30 days from service of the informal response upon the Chief Counsel byserving respondent written notice of termination of settlement negotiations.(g) By electing to make an informal response to a notice of proposed disqualification,the respondent does not waive the right to a hearing. However, the respondentmust submit the hearing request required by andSection; 209.311(a) withinl0 days after receipt of the notice of termination of settlement negotiationsfrom the Chief Counsel. Failure to submit such a request constitutes awaiver of the respondent's right to appear and contest the charges or theproposed disqualification. (h) The Chief Counsel may extend the period for requesting a hearing forgood cause shown, provided the request for extension is served before theexpiration of the period provided in paragraph (g) of this section. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.311 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Request for hearing. </ITAG>(a) If the respondent elects to request a hearing, he or she must submita written request within the time periods specified in andSection; 209.307(a)or andSection; 209.309(g) to the Chief Counsel referring to the case numberthat appears on the notice of proposed disqualification. The request mustcontain the following: (1) The name, address, and telephone number of the respondent and of therespondent's designated representative, if any; (2) A specific response admitting, denying, or explaining each allegationof the notice of disqualification order. (3) A description of the claims and defenses to be raised by the respondentat the hearing; and (4) The signature of the respondent or the representative, if any. (b) Upon receipt of a request for a hearing complying with the requirementsof paragraph (a) of this section, the Chief Counsel shall arrange for theappointment of a presiding officer and transmit the disqualification fileto the presiding officer, who shall schedule the hearing for the earliestpracticable date within the time period set by andSection; 209.321(a) ofthis subpart. (c) Upon assignment of a presiding officer, further matters in the proceedinggenerally are conducted by and through the presiding officer, except thatthe Chief Counsel and respondent may settle or voluntarily dismiss thecase without order of the presiding officer. The Chief Counsel shall promptlynotify the presiding officer of any settlement or dismissal of the case.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.313 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discovery. </ITAG>(a) Disqualification proceedings shall be conducted as expeditiously aspossible with due regard to the rights of the parties. Discovery is designedto enable a party to obtain relevant information needed for preparationof the party's case. These regulations are intended to provide a simple,timely, and relatively economical system for discovery. They shall be interpretedand applied so as to avoid delay and facilitate adjudication of the case.(b) Discovery may be obtained by requests for admission under andSection;209.6, requests for production of documentary or other tangible evidenceunder andSection; 209.7, and depositions under andSection; 209.8. (c) A party may initiate the methods of discovery permitted under paragraph(b) of this section at any time after respondent requests a hearing underandSection; 209.311. (d) Discovery shall be completed within 90 days after receipt of respondent'srequest for a hearing under andSection; 209.311. Upon motion for good causeshown, the presiding officer may extend this time period for an additional30 days. The presiding officer may grant an additional 30 day extensiononly when the party requesting the extension shows by clear and convincingevidence that the party was unable to complete discovery within the prescribedtime period through no fault or lack of due diligence of such party, andthat denial of the request would result in irreparable prejudice. (e) If a party fails to comply with a discovery order or an order to compel,the presiding officer may: (1) Strike any appropriate part of the pleadings or other submissions ofthe party failing to comply with such order; (2) Prohibit the party failing to comply with such order from introducingevidence relating to the information sought;(3) Draw an inference in favor of the requesting party with regard to theinformation sought; and (4) Permit the requesting party to introduce secondary evidence concerningthe information sought. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.315 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Subpoenas. </ITAG>Once a notice of proposed disqualification has been issued in a particularmatter, only the presiding officer may issue, deny, quash, or modify subpoenasunder this subpart in accordance with andSection; 209.7. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.317 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Official record. </ITAG>The notice of proposed disqualification, respondent's reply, exhibits,and verbatim record of testimony, if a hearing is held, and all pleadings,stipulations, and admissions filed and rulings and orders entered in thecourse of the proceeding shall constitute the exclusive and official record.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.319 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prehearing conference. </ITAG>(a) The parties shall confer with the presiding officer, either in personor by telephone, for a conference at least 10 days before the hearing toconsider: (1) Formulation and simplification of the issues; (2) Stipulations, admissions of fact, and admissions of the contents andauthenticity of documents; (3) Advance rulings from the presiding officer on the admissibility ofevidence; (4) Identification of witnesses, including the scope of their testimony,and of hearing exhibits; (5) Possibility of settlement; and (6) Such other matters as the presiding officer deems necessary to expeditethe disposition of the proceeding. (b) The record shall show the matters disposed of by order and by agreementin such a prehearing conference. The subsequent course of the hearing shallbe controlled by such action. (c) The prehearing conference shall be held within 150 days after receiptof respondent's request for a hearing under andSection; 209.311. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.321 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Hearing. </ITAG>(a) When a hearing is requested and scheduled under andSection; 209.311,a presiding officer designated by the Chief Administrative Law Judge ofthe Department convenes and presides over the hearing. The hearing shallbegin within 180 days from receipt of respondent's hearing request. Noticeof the time and place of the hearing shall be given to the parties at least20 days before the hearing. Testimony by witnesses shall be given underoath and the hearing shall be recorded verbatim. The hearing shall be opento the public, unless the presiding official determines that it would bein the best interests of the respondent, a witness, or other affected persons,to close all or any part of it. If the presiding official makes such adetermination, an appropriate order, which sets forth the reasons therefor,shall be entered. (b) The presiding officer may: (1) Administer oaths and affirmations; (2) Issue subpoenas as provided by andSection; 209.7; (3) Adopt procedures for the submission of evidence in written form; (4) Take or cause depositions to be taken as provided in andSection; 209.8;(5) Rule on offers of proof and receive relevant evidence; (6) Examine witnesses at the hearing;(7) Convene, recess, reconvene, adjourn, and otherwise regulate the courseof the hearing; (8) Hold conferences for settlement, simplification of the issues, or anyother proper purpose; and (9) Take any other action authorized by or consistent with the provisionsof this subpart and permitted by law that may expedite the hearing or aidin the disposition of an issue raised therein. (c) FRA has the burden of proof, by a preponderance of the evidence, asto the facts alleged in the notice of proposed disqualification, the reasonablenessof the conditions of the qualification proposed, and, except as providedin andSection; 209.329(a), the respondent's lack of fitness to perform safety-sensitivefunctions. The Chief Counsel may offer relevant evidence, including testimony,in support of the allegations contained in the notice of proposed disqualificationand conduct such cross-examination as may be required for a full disclosureof the material facts. (d) The respondent may appear and be heard on respondent's own behalf orthrough respondent's designated representative. The respondent may offerrelevant evidence, including testimony, in defense of the allegations orin mitigation of the proposed disqualification and conduct such cross-examinationas may be required for a full disclosure of the material facts. Respondenthas the burden of proof, by a preponderance of the evidence, as to anyaffirmative defense, including that respondent's actions were in obedienceto the direct order of a railroad supervisor or higher level official.(e) The record shall be closed at the conclusion of the hearing, unlessthe parties request the opportunity to submit proposed findings and conclusions.When the presiding officer allows the parties to submit proposed findingsand conclusions, documents previously identified for introduction intoevidence, briefs, or other posthearing submissions the record shall beleft open for such time as the presiding officer grants for that purpose.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.323</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Initial decision. </ITAG>(a) The presiding officer shall prepare an initial decision after the closingof the record. The initial decision may dismiss the notice of proposeddisqualification, in whole or in part, sustain the charges and proposeddisqualification, or sustain the charges and mitigate the proposed disqualification.(b) If the presiding officer sustains the charges and the proposed disqualification,dismisses some of the charges, or mitigates the proposed disqualification,the presiding officer shall issue and serve an appropriate order disqualifyingrespondent from engaging in the safety-sensitive functions described inandSection; 209.303. If the presiding officer dismisses all of the chargesset forth in notice of proposed disqualification, a dismissal order shallbe issued and served. (c) Each initial decision shall contain: (1) Findings of fact and conclusions of law, as well as the reasons orbases therefor, upon all the material issues of fact and law presentedon the record; (2) An order, as described in paragraph (b) of this section; (3) The dates any disqualification is to begin and end and other conditions,if any, that the respondent must satisfy before the disqualification orderis discharged; and (4) The date upon which the decision will become final, as prescribed inandSection; 209.325. (5) Notice of the parties' appeal rights, as prescribed in andSection; 209.327.(d) The decision shall be served upon the FRA Chief Counsel and the respondent.The Chief Counsel shall provide a copy of the disqualification order tothe railroad by which the respondent is employed. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.325</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Finality of decision. </ITAG>(a) The initial decision of the presiding officer shall become final 35days after issuance. Such decisions are not precedent.(b) Exception. The initial decision shall not become final if, within 35days after issuance of the decision, any party files an appeal under andSection;209.327. The timely filing of such an appeal shall stay the order in theinitial decision. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.327 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Appeal. </ITAG>(a) Any party aggrieved by an initial decision issued under andSection; 209.323may file an appeal. The appeal must be filed within 35 days of issuanceof the initial decision with the Federal Railroad Administrator, 400 SeventhStreet, SW., Washington, DC 20590. A copy of the appeal shall be servedon each party. The appeal shall set forth objections to the initial decision,supported by reference to applicable laws and regulations, and with specificreference to the record. If the Administrator has played any role in investigating,prosecuting, or deciding to prosecute the particular case, the Administratorshall recuse him or herself and delegate his or her authority under thissection to a person not so involved. (b) A party may file a reply to an appeal within 25 days of service ofthe appeal. If the party relies on evidence contained in the record forthe reply, the party shall specifically refer to the pertinent evidencein the record. (c) The Administrator may extend the period for filing an appeal or a responsefor good cause shown, provided the written request for extension is servedbefore the expiration of the applicable period provided in paragraph (c)or (d) of this section. (d) The Administrator has sole discretion to permit oral argument on theappeal. On the Administrator's own initiative or upon written motion byany party, the Administrator may determine that oral argument will contributesubstantially to the development of the issues on appeal and may grantthe parties an opportunity for oral argument. (e) The Administrator may affirm, reverse, alter, or modify the decisionof the presiding officer, or may remand the case for further proceedingsbefore the presiding officer. The Administrator shall inform the partiesand the presiding officer of his or her decision. (f) The decision of the Administrator is final, constitutes final agencyaction, and is not subject to further administrative review. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.329 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Assessment considerations. </ITAG>(a) Proof of a respondent's willful violation of one of the requirementsof parts 213 through 236 (excluding parts 225, 228, and 233) of this titleestablishes a rebuttable presumption that the respondent is unfit to performthe safety-sensitive functions described in andSection; 209.303. Where suchpresumption arises, the respondent has the burden of establishing that,taking account of the factors in paragraph (b) of this section, he or sheis fit to perform the foregoing safety-sensitive functions for the periodand under the other conditions, if any, proposed in the notice of proposeddisqualification. (b) In determining respondent's lack of fitness to perform safety-sensitivefunctions and the duration and other conditions, if any, of appropriatedisqualification orders under andSection;andSection; 209.309, 209.323, and209.327, the factors to be considered, to the extent: each is pertinentto the respondent's case, include but are not limited to the following:(1) The nature and circumstances of the violation, including whether theviolation was intentional, technical, or inadvertent, was committed willfully,or was frequently repeated; (2) The adverse impact or the potentially adverse impact of the violationon the health and safety of persons and the safety of property; (3) The railroad's operating rules, safety rules, and repair and maintenancestandards; (4) Repair and maintenance standards adopted by the industry; (5) The consistency of the conditions of the proposed disqualificationwith disqualification orders issued against other employees for the sameor similar violations;(6) Whether the respondent was on notice of any safety regulations thatwere violated or whether the respondent had been warned about the conductin question; (7) The respondent's past record of committing violations of safety regulations,including previous FRA warnings issued, disqualifications imposed, civilpenalties assessed, railroad disciplinary actions, and criminal convictionstherefor; (8) The civil penalty scheduled for the violation of the safety regulationin question; (9) Mitigating circumstances surrounding the violation, such as the existenceof an emergency situation endangering persons or property and the needfor the respondent to take immediate action; and (10) Such other factors as may be warranted in the public interest. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.331</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Enforcement of disqualification order. </ITAG>(a) A railroad that employs or formerly employed an individual servingunder a disqualification order shall inform prospective or actual employersof the terms and conditions of the order upon receiving notice that thedisqualified employee is being considered for employment with or is employedby another railroad to perform any of the safety-sensitive functions describedin andSection; 209.303. (b) A railroad that is considering hiring an individual to perform thesafety-sensitive functions described in andSection; 209.303 shall ascertainfrom the individual's previous employer, if such employer was a railroad,whether the individual is subject to a disqualification order. (c) An individual subject to a disqualification order shall inform hisor her employer of the order and provide a copy thereof within 5 days afterreceipt of the order. Such an individual shall likewise inform any prospectiveemployer who is considering hiring the individual to perform any of thesafety-sensitive functions described in andSection; 209.303 of the orderand provide a copy thereof within 5 days after receipt of the order orupon application for the position, whichever first occurs. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.333</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Prohibitions. </ITAG>(a) An individual subject to a disqualification order shall not work forany railroad in any manner inconsistent with the order. (b) A railroad shall not employ any individual subject to a disqualificationorder in any manner inconsistent with the order. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 209.335</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Penalties. </ITAG>(a) Any individual who violates andSection; 209.331(c) or andSection; 209.333(a)may be permanently disqualified from performing the safety-sensitive functionsdescribed in andSection; 209.303. Any individual who willfully violates andSection;209.331(c) or andSection; 209.333(a) may also be assessed a civil penaltyof at least $1,000 and not more than $5,000 per violation. (b) Any railroad that violates andSection; 209.331 (a) or (b) or andSection;209.333(b) may be assessed a civil penalty of at least $5,000 and not morethan $10,000 per violation. (c) Each day a violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.<ITAG tagnum="21">Issued in Washington, DC, on October 11, 1989.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Gilbert E. Carmichael, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Federal Railroad Administrator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-24523 Filed 10-17-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-06-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>